South Dakota, session 2026, SB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-39-43 be AMENDED:
10-39-43. For the privilege of severing precious metals in this state, there There
is imposed on each person severing gold in this state, a severance tax of four dollars per
ounce of one one-half percent of the market value of gold severed by the person in this
state.
For purposes of this section, "market value" means the average London Bullion
Market Association price of gold, over the calendar quarter in which the gold was severed.
Section 2. That § 10-39-54 be AMENDED:
10-39-54. The tax revenue collected by the secretary of the department pursuant
to § 10-39-43 must be deposited into the general fund, up to a maximum amount of one
million dollars in each year. The tax revenue collected pursuant to § 10-39-43, in excess
of one million dollars a year, must be deposited into the rural water infrastructure fund
established under section 3 of this Act.
All other taxes, interest, and penalties imposed and collected by the secretary of
revenue under this chapter shall must be distributed as follows:
(1) For persons severing precious metals that were in business in the state prior to
January 1, 1981, all revenues collected shall must be deposited in the state
treasury and credited to the general fund;
(2) For persons permitted on or after January 1, 1981, for the purpose of severing
precious metals, eighty percent of the revenues collected shall must be deposited
in the state treasury and credited to the general fund, while the remaining twenty
percent shall must be remitted by the secretary of revenue to the treasurer of the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

7B 2 7
county in which the precious metals were severed. When the county has received
a total of one million five hundred thousand dollars attributable to any person
subject to the tax, all future in a year, the subsequent revenues attributable to
that person shall collected in that year must be deposited in the state treasury and
credited to the general fund. No merger, consolidation or acquisition of a person
subject to §§ 10-39-54 to 10-39-54.4, inclusive, by another such person shall limit
the share of revenue due to the county from the person so acquired.
However, any Any revenues attributed to the severance of precious metals from
lands owned or controlled by the State of South Dakota shall must be deposited in the
common school permanent fund.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-39:
There is created in the state treasury the rural water infrastructure fund. The fund
consists of the moneys designated for deposit in the fund pursuant to § 10-39-54.
The Department of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall administer the fund.
The purpose of the fund is to provide matching grants for rural water system infrastructure
projects in this state. Interest on moneys in the fund must remain in the fund.
Expenditures from the fund require a special appropriation.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.